Wisconsin, session 2025, AB973.
do enact as follows:AB973,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB973,28Section 2. 20.435 (7) (f) of the statutes is created to read:AB973,2,11920.435 (7) (f) Economic support specialist grants. As a continuing 10appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for grants to fund economic support 11specialist positions under 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (this act), section 4 (1) (b) and (c).AB973,312Section 3. 20.435 (7) (f) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 13(this act), is repealed.AB973,414Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.AB973,2,1515(1) Economic support specialist grants.AB973,2,1716(a) In this subsection, “resource center” has the meaning given in s. 46.2805 17(10).AB973,2,2318(b) From the appropriation under s. 20.435 (7) (f), the department of health 19services shall award grants to 10 counties to fund an economic support specialist 20position in the resource center that serves the county. The department of health 21services shall give the following preference in awarding 6 of the grants under this 22paragraph, and the department of health services may award the remaining 4 23grants as determined by the department of health services:AB973,2,24241. One grant each to 2 rural counties.AB973,3,112. One grant each to 2 suburban counties.AB973,3,223. One grant each to 2 urban counties.AB973,3,73(c) From the appropriation under s. 20.435 (7) (f), if funding is available in 4that appropriation after the department of health services awards the grants under 5par. (b), the department of health services may award a grant to an 11th county to 6fund an economic support specialist position in the resource center that serves the 7county.AB973,3,108(d) The department of health services may not award a grant under par. (b) or 9(c) after the last day of the 12th month beginning after the effective date of this 10paragraph.AB973,3,1611(e) Within one year after receiving a grant under par. (b) or (c), a grant 12recipient shall submit to the department of health services and the appropriate 13standing committees of the legislature under s. 13.172 (3) a report that details the 14effectiveness of the grant, including, since the receipt of the grant, the estimated 15number of individuals served by the economic support specialist who was hired as a 16result of the grant.AB973,517Section 5. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 18publication, except as follows:AB973,3,1919(1) The repeal of s. 20.435 (7) (f) takes effect on July 1, 2027.AB973,3,2020